Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1014.01
Trust deed; reconveyance; beneficiary's obligation and liability.

Section 76-2803 shall govern the beneficiary's obligation to record or cause to be recorded a deed of reconveyance and the liability of the beneficiary for failure to timely record or cause to be recorded a deed of reconveyance.

Laws 1994, LB 1275, § 9;

Laws 1995, LB 396, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 32;

Laws 2003, LB 218, § 19;

Laws 2018, LB750, § 4.
July 19, 2018